North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-20.2 Juvenile Court Act
27-20.2-17.
Rights and duties of legal custodian.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section, “sibling of the child entering foster care” means:

A brother or sister who has at least one biological or adoptive parent in common;

A fictive brother or sister with a significant bond as identified by the child or parent; or

A child who would have been considered a sibling but for the termination or other disruption of parental rights, including a death of a parent.

A legal custodian has:

The right to the physical custody of the child and the right to determine the nature of the care, placement, and treatment of the child, including ordinary medical care as well as medical or surgical treatment for a serious physical condition or illness that in the opinion of a licensed physician requires prompt treatment, except for any limits the court may impose.

The right and duty to provide for the care, protection, training, and education and the physical, mental, and moral welfare of the child, subject to the conditions and limitations of the order and to the remaining rights and duties of the child’s parents or guardian.

A duty within thirty days after the removal of a child from the custody of the parent or parents of the child for the purpose of placement into foster care, to exercise due diligence to identify and provide notice to the following relatives: all parents of a sibling of the child entering foster care who have legal custody of the sibling, all adult grandparents, and any other adult suggested by the parents, subject to exceptions due to family or domestic violence, that:

Specifies that the child has been or is being removed from the custody of the parent or parents of the child;

Explains the options the relative has under federal, state, and local law to participate in the care and placement of the child, including any options that may be lost by failing to respond to the notice;

Describes the requirements and standards to become a foster family home and the additional services and supports that are available for children placed in that home; and

Describes how the relative of the child may enter an agreement with the department of human services and human service zone to receive a subsidized guardianship payment.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-17.
Rights and duties of legal custodian.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this section, “sibling of the child entering foster care” means:

A brother or sister who has at least one biological or adoptive parent in common;

A fictive brother or sister with a significant bond as identified by the child or parent; or

A child who would have been considered a sibling but for the termination or other disruption of parental rights, including a death of a parent.

A legal custodian has:

The right to the physical custody of the child and the right to determine the nature of the care, placement, and treatment of the child, including ordinary medical care as well as medical or surgical treatment for a serious physical condition or illness that in the opinion of a licensed physician requires prompt treatment, except for any limits the court may impose.

The right and duty to provide for the care, protection, training, and education and the physical, mental, and moral welfare of the child, subject to the conditions and limitations of the order and to the remaining rights and duties of the child’s parents or guardian.

A duty within thirty days after the removal of a child from the custody of the parent or parents of the child for the purpose of placement into foster care, to exercise due diligence to identify and provide notice to the following relatives: all parents of a sibling of the child entering foster care who have legal custody of the sibling, all adult grandparents, and any other adult suggested by the parents, subject to exceptions due to family or domestic violence, that:

Specifies that the child has been or is being removed from the custody of the parent or parents of the child;

Explains the options the relative has under federal, state, and local law to participate in the care and placement of the child, including any options that may be lost by failing to respond to the notice;

Describes the requirements and standards to become a foster family home and the additional services and supports that are available for children placed in that home; and

Describes how the relative of the child may enter an agreement with the department of health and human services and human service zone to receive a subsidized guardianship payment.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective September 1, 2022.

27-20.2-18.
Guardian ad litem — Immunity.

The court at any stage of a proceeding under this chapter, on application of a party or on motion of the court, shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is a party to the proceeding if the child has no parent, guardian, or custodian appearing on the child’s behalf or the interests of the parent, guardian, or custodian conflict with the child’s or in any other case in which the interests of the child require a guardian. A party to the proceeding or that party’s employee or representative may not be appointed. A guardian ad litem appointed under this section is immune from civil liability for damages for any act or omission arising out of that individual’s duties and responsibilities as a guardian ad litem, unless the act or omission constitutes gross or willful negligence or gross or willful misconduct.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-19.
Costs and expenses for care of child.

The following expenses are a charge upon the funds of the county or human service zone upon certification of the expenses by the court:

The cost of medical and other examinations and treatment of a child ordered by the court.

The cost of care and support of a child committed by the court to the legal custody of a public agency other than an institution for delinquent children or to a private agency or individual other than a parent.

The cost of any necessary transportation for medical and other examinations and treatment of a child ordered by the court unless the child is in the legal custody of a state agency.

The cost of a guardian ad litem under subsection 5 of section 27-20.1-16 or section 30.1-27-06 or the cost of an attorney under subsection 6 of section 27-20.1-16 if the court finds the parent’s or child’s estate is insufficient to meet the cost.

The commission on legal counsel for indigents shall pay reasonable compensation for services and related expenses of counsel provided at public expense for a party and the supreme court shall pay reasonable compensation for a guardian ad litem. The attorney general shall pay the witness fees, mileage, and travel expense of witnesses incurred in the proceedings under this chapter in the amount and at the rate provided for in section 31-01-16, except the commission on legal counsel for indigents shall pay the witness fees, mileage, and travel expenses of witnesses subpoenaed by counsel employed by or contracted with the commission for proceedings under this chapter in the amount and at the rate provided for in section 31-01-16. Expenses of the state include the cost of any necessary transportation for medical and other examinations and treatment of a child ordered by the court if the child is in the legal custody of a state agency in which case the cost must be reimbursed to the county or human service zone by that state agency at the state mileage rate, excluding meals and lodging, plus twenty-nine cents per mile.

If, after due notice to the parents or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the child, and to a child over the age of eighteen, and after affording the parents, other persons, and children over eighteen years of age an opportunity to be heard, the court finds that the parents, other persons, or a child over eighteen years of age is financially able to pay all or part of the costs and expenses stated in subsection 1, and expenses payable by the supreme court under subsection 2, the court may order the party to pay the same and prescribe the manner of payment. Unless otherwise ordered, payment shall be made to the clerk of court for remittance to the person to which compensation is due, or if the costs and expenses have been paid by the county, human service zone, or the state to the county treasurer of the county, the county treasurer of the host county, or to the state treasurer.

Unless the court finds there is no likelihood the party is or will be able to pay attorney’s fees and expenses, the court, in the order or judgment following a hearing under this chapter, shall order the parents or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the child, and the child if over the age of eighteen, to reimburse the presumed amount of indigent defense costs and expenses, as determined by the commission on legal counsel for indigents, and shall notify the party of the right to a hearing on the reimbursement amount. If the party or the state requests a hearing within thirty days of receiving notice under this subsection, the court shall schedule a hearing at which the actual amount of attorney’s fees and expenses must be shown. In determining the amount of reimbursement and method of payment, the court shall consider the financial resources of the party and the nature of the burden that reimbursement of costs and expenses will impose.

A party who is required to reimburse indigent defense costs and expenses and who is not willfully in default in that reimbursement may at any time petition the court to waive reimbursement of all or any portion of the attorney’s fees and expenses. If the court is satisfied reimbursement of the amount due will impose undue hardship on the party or the party’s immediate family, the court may waive reimbursement of all or any portion of the amount due or modify the method of payment.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-20.
Protective order.

At any stage of the proceedings, upon application of a party or on the court’s own motion, the court may make an order restraining or otherwise controlling the conduct of a person if:

The court finds that the conduct:

Is or may be detrimental or harmful to the child; or

Will tend to defeat the execution of an order of disposition; and

Notice of the application or motion and the grounds for the appropriate motion and an opportunity to be heard have been given to the person against which the order is directed.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-21.
Inspection of court files and records — Penalty.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Except as provided in this section, all files and records of the juvenile court, whether in the office of the clerk of court or juvenile court, of a proceeding under this chapter are closed to the public. Juvenile court files and records are open to inspection only by:

The judge and staff of the juvenile court.

The parties to the proceeding or the parties’ counsel or the guardian ad litem of any party.

A public or private agency or institution providing supervision or having custody of the child under order of the juvenile court which must be given a copy of the findings and order of disposition when the agency or institution receives custody of the child. If a case involves the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 [25 U.S.C. 1901 through 1963], the agency or institution having custody of the child shall serve the appropriate Indian Child Welfare Act service agent, tribe or tribal designee, or an Indian Child Welfare Act qualified expert witness with the findings and order of disposition.

Any court and the court’s probation and other officials or professional staff and the attorney for the defendant for use in preparing a presentence report in a criminal case in which the defendant is convicted and who, before the criminal case, had been a party to the proceeding in juvenile court.

The professional staff of the uniform crime victims compensation program if necessary for the discharge of the duties of the staff pursuant to chapter 54-23.4.

A staff member of the division of children and family services of the department of human services or a law enforcement officer if necessary for the performance of that staff member’s duties under section 50-11.1-06.2 or the federal National Child Protection Act of 1993 [Pub. L. 103-209; 107 Stat. 2490; 42 U.S.C. 5119 et seq.].

An employee or agent of the department of human services if necessary for performance of that individual’s duty under chapter 50-11 or 50-11.1 to investigate the background of an individual living or working in the facility, home, or residence for which licensure is sought.

A criminal justice agency if the juvenile is required to register under section 12.1-32-15.

The staff of a children’s advocacy center if the juvenile or a victim of the child has been referred for or has received services at the children’s advocacy center.

A victim of the delinquent child or the victim’s guardian. All records including medical, educational, and school information must be redacted before inspection. For purposes of this subdivision, only records pertaining to the specific offense between the victim and the delinquent child may be inspected.

The information technology department to the extent authorized by the supreme court for use in the statewide longitudinal data system.

Juvenile court files and records are also open to inspection with written leave of a juvenile court judge or judicial referee to whom juvenile court matters have been referred:

Upon a showing in writing of a legitimate interest in a proceeding or in the work of the juvenile court, but only to the extent necessary to respond to the legitimate interest; and

By the principal of any public or private school that is a member of the North Dakota high school activities association, or the superintendent of any school district that has one or more schools involved in the association, but only to the extent necessary to enforce the rules and regulations of the North Dakota high school activities association.

In a proceeding under this chapter, if the juvenile court finds a child committed a delinquent act that constitutes a violation of a law or local ordinance governing the operation of a motor vehicle or a delinquent act of manslaughter or negligent homicide caused by the child’s operation of a motor vehicle, the juvenile court shall report the finding to the director of the department of transportation within ten days.

Following an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult, the child’s school principal, chief administrative officer, or designated school guidance counselor, if requested, must be allowed access to the disposition order. Any other juvenile court files and records of a child may be disclosed to a superintendent or principal of the school in which the child is currently enrolled or in which the child wishes to enroll if the child’s documented behavior appears to present a danger to self or to the students or staff of the school.

Following an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that results in the prohibitions included in subsection 1 or 2 of section 62.1-02-01, if requested, a law enforcement officer must be allowed access to the disposition order.

The juvenile court may notify a referring agency of the disposition of a case.

Notwithstanding that juvenile court records are closed to the public, nothing in this section may be construed to limit the release upon request of general information not identifying the identity of any juvenile, witness, or victim in any proceeding under this chapter. Files in the clerk of court’s office are open to public inspection if the related hearing was open to the public under section 27-20.3-13.

To the extent necessary to provide victim services or benefits under chapter 12.1-41, the judge and staff of the juvenile court may disclose information to refer a child, who may be a victim of human trafficking, to a program for runaway and homeless children located in the state and approved by the juvenile court of jurisdiction. Information disclosed under this subsection must remain confidential.

An individual with access or authorization to inspect juvenile court files and records under this section may not share the information contained in the files and records with any other person not authorized by law. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 550, § 3, effective December 1, 2021.

27-20.2-21.
Inspection of court files and records — Penalty.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

Except as provided in this section, all files and records of the juvenile court, whether in the office of the clerk of court or juvenile court, of a proceeding under this chapter are closed to the public. Juvenile court files and records are open to inspection only by:

The judge and staff of the juvenile court.

The parties to the proceeding or the parties’ counsel or the guardian ad litem of any party.

A public or private agency or institution providing supervision or having custody of the child under order of the juvenile court which must be given a copy of the findings and order of disposition when the agency or institution receives custody of the child. If a case involves the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 [25 U.S.C. 1901 through 1963], the agency or institution having custody of the child shall serve the appropriate Indian Child Welfare Act service agent, tribe or tribal designee, or an Indian Child Welfare Act qualified expert witness with the findings and order of disposition.

Any court and the court’s probation and other officials or professional staff and the attorney for the defendant for use in preparing a presentence report in a criminal case in which the defendant is convicted and who, before the criminal case, had been a party to the proceeding in juvenile court.

The professional staff of the uniform crime victims compensation program if necessary for the discharge of the duties of the staff pursuant to chapter 54-23.4.

A staff member of the division of children and family services of the department of health and human services or a law enforcement officer if necessary for the performance of that staff member’s duties under section 50-11.1-06.2 or the federal National Child Protection Act of 1993 [Pub. L. 103-209; 107 Stat. 2490; 42 U.S.C. 5119 et seq.].

An employee or agent of the department of health and human services if necessary for performance of that individual’s duty under chapter 50-11 or 50-11.1 to investigate the background of an individual living or working in the facility, home, or residence for which licensure is sought.

A criminal justice agency if the juvenile is required to register under section 12.1-32-15.

The staff of a children’s advocacy center if the juvenile or a victim of the child has been referred for or has received services at the children’s advocacy center.

A victim of the delinquent child or the victim’s guardian. All records including medical, educational, and school information must be redacted before inspection. For purposes of this subdivision, only records pertaining to the specific offense between the victim and the delinquent child may be inspected.

The information technology department to the extent authorized by the supreme court for use in the statewide longitudinal data system.

Juvenile court files and records are also open to inspection with written leave of a juvenile court judge or judicial referee to whom juvenile court matters have been referred:

Upon a showing in writing of a legitimate interest in a proceeding or in the work of the juvenile court, but only to the extent necessary to respond to the legitimate interest; and

By the principal of any public or private school that is a member of the North Dakota high school activities association, or the superintendent of any school district that has one or more schools involved in the association, but only to the extent necessary to enforce the rules and regulations of the North Dakota high school activities association.

In a proceeding under this chapter, if the juvenile court finds a child committed a delinquent act that constitutes a violation of a law or local ordinance governing the operation of a motor vehicle or a delinquent act of manslaughter or negligent homicide caused by the child’s operation of a motor vehicle, the juvenile court shall report the finding to the director of the department of transportation within ten days.

Following an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult, the child’s school principal, chief administrative officer, or designated school guidance counselor, if requested, must be allowed access to the disposition order. Any other juvenile court files and records of a child may be disclosed to a superintendent or principal of the school in which the child is currently enrolled or in which the child wishes to enroll if the child’s documented behavior appears to present a danger to self or to the students or staff of the school.

Following an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that results in the prohibitions included in subsection 1 or 2 of section 62.1-02-01, if requested, a law enforcement officer must be allowed access to the disposition order.

The juvenile court may notify a referring agency of the disposition of a case.

Notwithstanding that juvenile court records are closed to the public, nothing in this section may be construed to limit the release upon request of general information not identifying the identity of any juvenile, witness, or victim in any proceeding under this chapter. Files in the clerk of court’s office are open to public inspection if the related hearing was open to the public under section 27-20.3-13.

To the extent necessary to provide victim services or benefits under chapter 12.1-41, the judge and staff of the juvenile court may disclose information to refer a child, who may be a victim of human trafficking, to a program for runaway and homeless children located in the state and approved by the juvenile court of jurisdiction. Information disclosed under this subsection must remain confidential.

An individual with access or authorization to inspect juvenile court files and records under this section may not share the information contained in the files and records with any other person not authorized by law. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 550, § 3, effective December 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective September 1, 2022.

27-20.2-22.
Disclosure of information needed to apprehend child.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the name, photographs, fingerprints, or other identifying information of a child who is alleged to have committed a delinquent act involving actual or threat of serious bodily injury which would constitute a felony if committed by an adult or who left without authorization from a secure detention facility may be released by law enforcement, the division of juvenile services, or the juvenile court for purposes of apprehending the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-23.
Law enforcement and correctional facility records.

Unless a charge of delinquency is transferred for criminal prosecution under section 27-20.4-20, the interest of national security requires, or the court otherwise orders in the interest of the child, the law enforcement and correctional facility records and files of a child alleged or found to be delinquent or in need of services or protection are not open to public inspection; but inspection of these records and files is permitted by:

A juvenile court having the child before the court in any proceeding;

Counsel for a party to the proceeding;

The officers of public institutions or agencies to whom the child is or may be committed;

Law enforcement officers of other jurisdictions if necessary for the discharge of official duties of the officers;

A court in which the child is convicted of a criminal offense for the purpose of a presentence report or other dispositional proceeding, or by officials of correctional facilities to which the child is detained or committed, or by the parole board, the governor, or the pardon advisory board, if one has been appointed, in considering the child’s parole or discharge or in exercising supervision over the child;

The professional staff of the uniform crime victims compensation program if necessary for the discharge of the duties of the professional staff pursuant to chapter 54-23.4; and

A superintendent, assistant superintendent, principal, or designee of the school in which the child is currently enrolled or of a school in which the child wishes to enroll.

Notwithstanding that law enforcement records and files of a child alleged or found to be delinquent or in need of services or protection are not open to public inspection, this section does not limit the release of general information that does not identify the identity of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-24.
Children’s fingerprints, photographs.

A child under fourteen years of age may not be fingerprinted in the investigation of a crime except as provided in this section. Fingerprints of a child who is referred to the court may be taken and filed by law enforcement officers in investigating the commission of the following crimes: murder, manslaughter, gross sexual imposition, robbery, aggravated assault, burglary, theft, forgery, and unlawful possession or use of a handgun.

Fingerprint files of children must be kept separate from those of adults. Copies of fingerprints known to be those of a child may be maintained locally and copies may be sent to a central state depository but may not be sent to a federal depository unless needed in the interest of national security.

Fingerprint files of children may be inspected by law enforcement officers if necessary for the discharge of official duties of law enforcement officers. Other inspections may be authorized by the court in individual cases upon a showing it is necessary in the public interest.

Fingerprints of a child are considered a part of the child’s juvenile or adult investigative file and must be removed from the state and local files and destroyed in accordance with section 27-20.2-25.

If latent fingerprints are found during the investigation of an offense and a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe the latent fingerprints are those of a particular child, the officer may fingerprint the child regardless of age or offense for purposes of immediate comparison with the latent fingerprints. If the comparison is negative, the fingerprint card and other copies of the fingerprints taken must be destroyed immediately. If the child is not referred to the court, the fingerprints must be destroyed immediately.

A child may be photographed by a law enforcement officer at the time of arrest for the crimes of murder, manslaughter, gross sexual imposition, robbery, aggravated assault, burglary, theft, forgery, or unlawful possession or use of a handgun. The photograph must be destroyed if the child is not referred to the juvenile court. If a court finds facts that would justify a finding that a child at least fourteen years of age at the time of the offense is delinquent and the finding involves the unlawful use or possession of a handgun or the commission of an act proscribed by the criminal laws of this state and punishable as a felony or a class A misdemeanor committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association or affiliation with any criminal street gang, with the intent to promote, further, or assist in the activities of a criminal gang, the juvenile court shall order upon the request of the state’s attorney the taking and retention of a photograph of the child for purposes of identification. Photographs of children under this subsection may be maintained on a local basis and sent to a central state depository but must be maintained separate from those of adults and must be destroyed in accordance with section 27-20.2-25.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-25.
Destruction of juvenile court records.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Except as otherwise required under section 25-03.3-04, all juvenile court records must be retained and disposed of pursuant to rules and policies established by the North Dakota supreme court.

Upon the final destruction of a file or record, the proceeding must be treated as if the proceeding never occurred. The juvenile court shall notify each agency named in the file or record of the destruction. All index references, except those which may be made by the attorney general and the directors of the department of transportation, the department of human services, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, the commission on legal counsel for indigents and its public defender offices, law enforcement agencies, and human service zones, must be deleted. Each agency, except the attorney general and the directors of the department of transportation, the department of human services, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, the commission on legal counsel for indigents and its public defender offices, law enforcement agencies, and human service zones, upon notification of the destruction of a file or record, shall destroy all files, records, and references to the child’s apprehension, detention, and referral to the juvenile court and any record of disposition made by the juvenile court. The attorney general, the department of human services, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, the commission on legal counsel for indigents and its public defender offices, law enforcement agencies, and human service zones may not keep a juvenile file or record longer than is required by the records retention policy of that official, department, or agency. Upon inquiry in any matter the child, the court, and representatives of agencies, except the attorney general and the directors of the department of transportation, the department of human services, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, law enforcement agencies, and human service zones, properly shall reply that no record exists with respect to the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-25.
Destruction of juvenile court records.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

Except as otherwise required under section 25-03.3-04, all juvenile court records must be retained and disposed of pursuant to rules and policies established by the North Dakota supreme court.

Upon the final destruction of a file or record, the proceeding must be treated as if the proceeding never occurred. The juvenile court shall notify each agency named in the file or record of the destruction. All index references, except those which may be made by the attorney general and the directors of the department of transportation, the department of health and human services, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, the commission on legal counsel for indigents and its public defender offices, law enforcement agencies, and human service zones, must be deleted. Each agency, except the attorney general and the directors of the department of transportation, the department of health and human services, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, the commission on legal counsel for indigents and its public defender offices, law enforcement agencies, and human service zones, upon notification of the destruction of a file or record, shall destroy all files, records, and references to the child’s apprehension, detention, and referral to the juvenile court and any record of disposition made by the juvenile court. The attorney general, the department of health and human services, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, the commission on legal counsel for indigents and its public defender offices, law enforcement agencies, and human service zones may not keep a juvenile file or record longer than is required by the records retention policy of that official, department, or agency. Upon inquiry in any matter the child, the court, and representatives of agencies, except the attorney general and the directors of the department of transportation, the department of health and human services, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, law enforcement agencies, and human service zones, properly shall reply that no record exists with respect to the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective September 1, 2022.

27-20.2-26.
Appeals.

An aggrieved party, including the state or a subdivision of the state, may appeal from a final order, judgment, or decree of the juvenile court to the supreme court by filing written notice of appeal within thirty days after entry of the order, judgment, or decree, or within any further time the supreme court grants, after entry of the order, judgment, or decree. The appeal must be heard by the supreme court upon the files, records, and minutes or transcript of the evidence of the juvenile court, giving appreciable weight to the findings of the juvenile court. The name of the child may not appear on the record on appeal.

The appeal does not stay the order, judgment, or decree appealed from, but the supreme court may otherwise order on application and hearing consistent with this chapter if suitable provision is made for the care and custody of the child. If the order, judgment, or decree appealed from grants the custody of the child to, or withholds custody of the child from, one or more of the parties to the appeal, the appeal must be heard at the earliest practicable time.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-27.
Rules of court.

The North Dakota supreme court may adopt rules of procedure governing proceedings under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-28.
In-state placement of juveniles — Exception.

Except for cases in which the specific necessary treatment is unavailable in the state or cases in which the appropriate treatment or services cannot be provided in a timely manner in the state, all juveniles in need of residential treatment or residential care placement must be placed in in-state residential facilities.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.